Utah statutes.
48-2a-1001.   Right of action.

A limited partner may bring an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action and the general partners' decision not to sue constitutes an abuse of discretion or involves a conflict of interest that prevents an unprejudiced exercise of judgment, or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

